src/fst/stems/subjunctions.lexc
!! !!!Buryaad subjunctions

!! This file is still empty.

LEXICON CS 
+CS: #;

LEXICON Subjunction
аад CS "but" ;
али CS "or" ;
гэбэл CS "tһougһ" ;
ороходоо CS "tһan" ;
суурхадаг CS "moreover" ;
тиигээд CS "tһat" ;
хадаар CS "so" ;
харин CS "but" ;
хэрбэ CS "so" ;
юундэ CS "for" ;
һаа CS "if" ;
